Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-965
Project of control without individual notice; control authority; powers.

A control authority may direct and carry out projects of control for one or more specific noxious weeds without individual notice as prescribed in section 2-955 if the control authority has caused publication of notices of such project as provided in this section. The notice shall be published in one or more newspapers of general circulation throughout the area over which such control authority has jurisdiction and shall be published weekly for four successive weeks prior to the project commencement date specified in the notice for the control project. Such notice shall state the noxious weed or weeds to be controlled by the project, the date the project will commence, and the approximate period of time when the project will be carried out. In no event shall a fine or lien be assessed against a landowner as prescribed in section 2-955 for a project under this section unless the control authority has caused individual notice to be served upon the landowner as specified in section 2-955.

Laws 2006, LB 1226, § 1.